src/fst/morphology/stems/interrogatives.lexc
LEXICON Interrogatives
unsa+Pron+Interr:unsa # ;       ! what
!hain+A+Interr:hain # ;      ! which Jaska:20240801: +A vs +Det
ngano+Pron+Interr:ngano # ;     ! why
! giunsa+Adv+Interr:giunsa # ;     ! how (extent/degree/quantity)
pila+Adv+Interr:pila # ;      ! how many
kanus-a+Adv+Interr:kanus-a # ;    ! when
kumusta+Adv+Interr:kumusta # ;   ! how <be> (condition/quality)
tagpila+Adv+Interr:tagpila # ;   ! how much (price)
!kang kinsa+Pron+Interr:kang kinsa # ; ! with whom, in whose possession, at whose place
asa+Pron+Interr:asa # ;    ! where <be>, which place(s) <be>
giunsa+Adv+Interr:giunsa # ;     ! how (manner/means/action done, but with volition)
naunsa+Adv+Interr:naunsa # ;     ! how (manner/means/action done, but with less volition)
unsaon+Adv+Interr:unsaon # ;     ! how (manner/means/action to be done)
!asa+Adv+Interr:asa # ;       ! where, which place(s), what
kinsa+Pron+Interr:kinsa # ;      ! whom, which person
taga-asa+Pron+Interr:taga-asa # ;  ! where (person's origin)
hain+Pron+Interr:asa # ;      ! where <be>, which place(s) <be>
